Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

7-58-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act".

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 761, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless this article states a different definition:

The terms defined in article 90 of this title have the meanings stated in that article unless this article states a different definition.

"Articles of organization" or "articles" means the articles of organization of a limited cooperative association required by section 7-58-302 containing provisions required or permitted by sections 7-58-303 and 7-58-306. The term includes the articles of organization as amended or restated.

"Board of directors" means the board of directors of a limited cooperative association.

"Bylaws" means the bylaws of a limited cooperative association required by section 7-58-304 containing provisions required or permitted by sections 7-58-305 and 7-58-306. The term includes the bylaws as amended or restated.

"Contribution", except as used in section 7-58-1008 (3), means a benefit that a person provides to a limited cooperative association to become or remain a member or in the person's capacity as a member.

"Cooperative" means a limited cooperative association or an entity organized under any cooperative law of any jurisdiction.

"Director" means a director of a limited cooperative association.

"Distribution", except as used in section 7-58-1007 (5), means a transfer of money or other property from a limited cooperative association to a member because of the member's financial rights or to a transferee of a member's financial rights.

"Financial rights" means the right to participate in allocations and distributions as provided in parts 10 and 12 of this article but does not include rights or obligations under a marketing contract governed by part 7 of this article.

"Governance rights" means the right to participate in governance of a limited cooperative association.

"Investor member" means a member that has made a contribution to a limited cooperative association and that:

Is not required by the articles or bylaws to conduct patronage with the association in the member's capacity as an investor member in order to receive or retain the member's interest; or

Is not permitted by the articles or bylaws to conduct patronage with the association in the member's capacity as an investor member in order to receive or retain the member's interest.

"Limited cooperative association" or "association" means an association organized under this article.

"Member" means a person that is admitted as a patron member or investor member, or both, in a limited cooperative association. The term does not include a person that has dissociated as a member.

"Member's interest" means the interest of a patron member or investor member with the attributes stated in section 7-58-601.

"Members meeting" means an annual members meeting or special meeting of members.

"Organizer" means a person who is named in the articles as an organizer.

"Patronage" means business transactions between a limited cooperative association and a person that entitle the person to receive financial rights based on the value or quantity of business done between the association and the person.

"Patron member" means a member that has made a contribution to a limited cooperative association and that:

Is required by the articles or bylaws to conduct patronage with the association in the member's capacity as a patron member in order to receive or retain the member's interest; or

Is permitted by the articles or bylaws to conduct patronage with the association in the member's capacity as a patron member in order to receive or retain the member's interest.

"Proper court" means the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the limited cooperative association's principal office is located or, if the association has no principal office in this state, the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located, or, if the association has no registered agent, the district court for the city and county of Denver.

"Record", used as a noun, means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

"Required information" means the information a limited cooperative association is required to maintain under section 7-58-112.

"Sign" means, with present intent, to authenticate or adopt a record by:

Executing or adopting a tangible symbol; or

Attaching to or logically associating with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

"Transfer" includes an assignment, conveyance, deed, bill of sale, lease, mortgage, security interest, encumbrance, gift, and transfer by operation of law.

"Voting group" means any combination of one or more voting members in one or more districts or classes that, under this article or the articles or bylaws, are entitled to vote and can be counted together collectively on a matter at a members meeting.

"Voting member" means a member that, under this article or the articles or bylaws, has a right to vote on matters subject to vote by members under this article or the articles or bylaws.

"Voting power" means the total current power of members to vote on a particular matter for which a vote may or is to be taken.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 761, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this article, see § 7-90-102.

7-58-103. Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The general assembly has the power to amend or repeal all or part of this article at any time, and all domestic and foreign limited cooperative associations subject to this article shall be governed by the amendment or repeal.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 764, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-104. Nature of limited cooperative association.

A limited cooperative association organized under this article is an autonomous, unincorporated association of persons united to meet their mutual interests through a jointly owned enterprise primarily controlled by those persons, the patronage of which is carried on for the mutual benefit of the patron members and that permits combining:

Ownership, financing, and receipt of benefits by the patron members for whose patronage the association is formed; and

Separate investments in the association by investor members who invest in the limited cooperative association and may receive returns on their investments and a share of control.

The fact that a limited cooperative association does not have more than one of the characteristics described in paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section or any of the characteristics described in paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section does not alone prevent the association from being formed under and governed by this article, nor does it alone provide a basis for an action against the association or a member.

The relations between a limited cooperative association and its members are consensual and contractual. Unless required, limited, or prohibited by this article or other applicable law, the articles and bylaws of an association may provide for any matter concerning the relations among the members of the association and between the members and the association, the activities of the association, and the conduct of its activities.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 764, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-105. Purpose of limited cooperative association.

A limited cooperative association is an entity distinct from its members.

A limited cooperative association may be organized for any lawful purpose, whether or not for profit.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 764, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-106. Powers.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles, every limited cooperative association has perpetual duration and succession in its domestic entity name and has the powers to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its business and affairs, including without limitation:

To sue and be sued, complain, and defend in its entity name, and to maintain an action against a member for harm caused to the association by the member's violation of a duty to the association or of this article or the articles or bylaws;

To have a seal, which may be altered at will, and to use the seal, or a facsimile thereof, including a rubber stamp, by impressing or affixing it or by reproducing it in any other manner;

To amend its articles and make and amend bylaws;

To purchase, receive, lease, and otherwise acquire, and to own, hold, improve, use, and otherwise deal with, real or personal property or any legal or equitable interest in property, wherever located;

To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property;

To purchase, receive, subscribe for, and otherwise acquire shares and other interests in, and obligations of, any other entity; and to own, hold, vote, use, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, and otherwise dispose of, and deal in and with, the same;

To make contracts and guarantees; incur liabilities; borrow money; issue notes, bonds, and other obligations, which may be convertible into or include the option to purchase other interests or securities of the association; and secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of any of its property, franchises, or income;

To lend money, invest and reinvest its funds, and receive and hold real and personal property as security for repayment;

To be an agent, an associate, a fiduciary, a manager, a member, a partner, an equity owner, a promoter, or a trustee of, or to hold any similar position with, any entity;

To conduct its business and activities, locate offices, and exercise the powers granted by this article within or without this state;

To elect and appoint directors, officers, employees, and agents of the association, define their duties, fix their compensation, and lend them money and credit;

To pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension trusts, profit-sharing plans, share bonus plans, share options and rights plans, and benefit or incentive plans for any of its current or former directors, officers, employees, and agents;

To make donations for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific, or educational purposes;

To make payments or donations and to do any other act, not inconsistent with law, that furthers the business and affairs of the association;

To establish conditions for admission of members, admit members, and issue or transfer memberships;

To impose dues, assessments, and admission and transfer fees upon its members;

To impose restrictions on the transfer of its membership interests or other interests in the association;

To carry on its business and affairs;

To indemnify current or former directors, officers, employees, fiduciaries, or agents as provided in part 9 of this article;

To limit the liability of its directors as provided in section 7-58-818; and

To cease its activities and dissolve.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 764, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-107. Governing law.

The law of this state governs:

The internal affairs of a limited cooperative association; and

The liability of a member as member and a director as director for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a limited cooperative association.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 766, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-108. Supplemental principles of law.

Unless displaced by particular provisions of this article, the principles of law and equity supplement this article.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 766, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-109. Requirements of other laws.

This article does not alter or amend any law that governs the licensing and regulation of an individual or entity in carrying on a specific business or profession even if that law permits the business or profession to be conducted by a limited cooperative association, a foreign cooperative, or its members.

A limited cooperative association shall not conduct an activity that, under the law of this state other than this article, may be conducted only by an entity that meets specific requirements for the internal affairs of that entity unless the articles or bylaws of the association conform to those requirements.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 766, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-110. Relation to restraint of trade and antitrust law.

No limited cooperative association formed under or subject to this article shall, solely by its organization and existence, be deemed to be a conspiracy or a combination in restraint of trade, an illegal monopoly, or an attempt to lessen competition or to fix prices arbitrarily, nor shall the marketing or purchasing contracts and agreements authorized in this article be considered illegal as such, in unlawful restraint of trade, or as part of a conspiracy or combination to accomplish an improper or illegal purpose.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 766, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-111. Name.

Use of the term "cooperative" or its abbreviation under this article or section 7-90-601 is not a violation of the provisions restricting the use of the term under section 7-90-601 (7)(a).

A limited cooperative association or a member may enforce the restrictions on the use of the term "cooperative" under section 7-90-601 (7).

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 767, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-112. Required information.

Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a limited cooperative association shall maintain in a record available at its principal office:

A list containing the name, last-known street address and, if different, mailing address, and term of office of each director and officer;

The initial articles and all amendments to and restatements of the articles;

The initial bylaws and all amendments to and restatements of the bylaws;

All filed statements of merger and statements of conversion;

All annual financial statements of the association for the three most recent fiscal years;

The minutes of members meetings and records of all action taken by members without a meeting for the three most recent years;

A list containing:

The name, in alphabetical order, and last-known street address and, if different, mailing address of each patron member and each investor member; and

If the association has districts or classes of members, information from which each member in a district or class may be identified;

The federal income tax returns and any state and local income tax returns of the association for the three most recent years;

Accounting records maintained by the association in the ordinary course of its operations for the three most recent years;

The minutes of all directors meetings and records of all action taken by directors without a meeting for the three most recent years;

The amount of money contributed and agreed to be contributed by each member;

A description and statement of the agreed value of contributions other than money made and agreed to be made by each member;

The times at which, or events on the happening of which, any additional contribution is to be made by each member;

For each member, a description and statement of the member's interest or information from which the description and statement can be derived; and

All communications concerning the association made in a record to all members, or to all members in a district or class, for the three most recent years.

If a limited cooperative association has existed for less than the period for which records must be maintained under subsection (1) of this section, the period for which records must be kept is the period of the association's existence.

The articles or bylaws may require that more information be maintained.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 767, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-113. Business transactions of member with limited cooperative association.

Subject to sections 7-58-818 and 7-58-819 and except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws or a specific contract relating to a transaction, a member may lend money to and transact other business with a limited cooperative association in the same manner as a person that is not a member.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 768, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-114. Dual capacity.

A person may have a patron member's interest and an investor member's interest. When such person acts as a patron member, the person is subject to this article and the articles and bylaws governing patron members. When such person acts as an investor member, the person is subject to this article and the articles and bylaws governing investor members.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 768, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.